Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 8 Retirement Of Judges And Court Employees
24-8-213. Credited service — Transfer of fourteen years' service as prosecuting attorney.

Any person who shall have served not less than fourteen (14) years as an elected prosecuting attorney in this state and who holds credited service therefor in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, as established by § 24-4-103, upon being elected as a circuit judge, chancery judge, or justice of the Supreme Court, is authorized to transfer his or her credited service in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System to the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System by:

Notifying, in writing, the administrative body of each of the retirement plans of his or her intention to so transfer his or her tenure;

Authorizing the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System to transfer to the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System any sums of money paid for his or her retirement to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System by the elected prosecuting attorney; and

Paying into the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System an amount of money he or she would have paid into the system for an equal amount of tenure as a judge of the court to which he or she has been elected, less the amount of money transferred from the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System as authorized in this section.

Upon transferring the credited service from the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, the person shall be given credited service in the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System for an equal number of years of credited service for which he or she has qualified under the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System as an elected prosecuting attorney.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 358, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-904.1.

24-8-214. Credited service — Transfer of four years' service as prosecuting attorney.

Any person who shall have served not less than two (2) years as an elected prosecuting attorney in this state and who holds credited service therefor in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, as established by § 24-4-103, anytime after being elected as a circuit judge, chancery judge, circuit-chancery judge, or justice of the Supreme Court, is authorized to transfer his or her credited service in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System to the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System by:

Notifying, in writing, the administrative body of each of the retirement plans of his or her intention to so transfer his or her tenure;

Authorizing the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System to transfer to the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System any sums of money paid for his or her retirement to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System by the elected prosecuting attorney; and

Paying into the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System an amount of money he or she would have paid into the system for an equal amount of tenure as a judge of the court to which he or she has been elected, less the amount of money transferred from the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System as authorized in this section.

Upon transferring the credited service from the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, the person shall be given credited service in the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System for an equal number of years of credited service for which he or she has qualified under the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System as an elected prosecuting attorney.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 192, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-913; Acts 1997, No. 926, § 1.

24-8-215. Eligibility for benefits — Retirement generally.

Any active member with a minimum of ten (10) years of credited service may voluntarily retire upon reaching sixty-five (65) years of age or thereafter upon filing a written application with the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System.

Any other member who has a minimum of twenty (20) years of credited service may retire regardless of age, and any judge or justice who has served at least fourteen (14) years shall be eligible for benefits upon reaching age sixty-five (65).

A judge or justice who is not seventy (70) years of age on the date on which he or she is elected to a term of office may complete the term without forfeiting his or her rights to retirement benefits under this section.

Any judge or justice who is not eligible to retire at age seventy (70) may continue to serve as judge until the completion of the term of office in which he or she receives sufficient credited service to retire without losing his or her retirement benefits.

The judge or justice shall lose all retirement benefits if he or she serves beyond the end of the term needed to get sufficient credited service to retire.

Otherwise, judges or justices must retire by their seventieth birthday or lose their retirement benefits.

However, any active judge or justice who was serving prior to July 1, 1965, may continue to serve until any age and shall, upon retirement, be eligible to receive retirement benefits.

In all cases of age and service retirement for judges or justices elected after July 1, 1983, the member must have a minimum of eight (8) years of actual service as a justice of the Supreme Court or a judge of the circuit or chancery courts or of the Court of Appeals.

The provisions of this section shall be accumulative to all present laws pertaining to the retirement of judges of the circuit and chancery courts and of justices of the Supreme Court and shall in no way repeal, amend, or modify such laws except as otherwise specifically provided in this section.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 365, § 2; 1963, No. 223, § 1; 1965, No. 139, § 2; 1967, No. 249, § 1; 1969, No. 370, §§ 1, 2; 1973, No. 407, § 1; 1983, No. 231, § 1; 1985, No. 289, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 22-902, 22-902n; Acts 1987, No. 256, § 1; 1991, No. 792, § 1; 2019, No. 753, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1983, No. 231, § 4, provided that that act would apply only to those judges or justices first elected after July 1, 1983, and the rights and interests in the Judicial Retirement System of any judge or justice first elected prior to July 1, 1983 would be determined according to the law as it existed prior to January 1, 1983, unless a judge or justice elected, in writing, that his or her rights in the Judicial Retirement System would be governed by Acts 1983, No. 231.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “A judge or justice who is not seventy (70) years of age on the date on which he or she is elected to a term of office” for “Any judge or justice who becomes seventy (70) years of age during a term of office to which he or she has been elected” in (c)(1).

24-8-216. Eligibility for benefits — Early retirement.

Any judge of a circuit or chancery court who has fourteen (14) years or more of credited service in the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System, established by Acts 1953, No. 365, may elect to retire and receive retirement benefits under the provisions of Acts 1953, No. 365, at any time after reaching age sixty-two (62) and before reaching age sixty-five (65).

The retirement benefits of any circuit or chancery judge electing to retire before age sixty-five (65) shall be reduced six percent (6%) for each full year and proportionately for any part of a year that the judge retires before reaching age sixty-five (65).

History.

Acts 1979, No. 648, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-902.3.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1953, No. 365 is codifed as §§ 24-8-201, 24-8-203, 24-8-207, 24-8-211, and 24-8-215 — 24-8-218.

24-8-217. Eligibility for benefits — Disability retirement.

Any member of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System who has served a minimum of three (3) consecutive years shall receive retirement benefits if any incapacitating disability as determined by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System shall occur during any term for which the judge has been elected.

The three-year service requirement shall only apply to judges elected after July 1, 1983.

A judgment of disability should not be granted by the board until it is reasonably assured of a judge's permanent physical or mental incapacity to perform the duties of his or her judicial office.

The board should act only upon proper certification of incapacity by two (2) or more physicians.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 365, § 2; 1963, No. 223, § 1; 1965, No. 139, § 2; 1967, No. 249, § 1; 1969, No. 370, § 1; 1973, No. 407, § 1; 1983, No. 231, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-902.

Publisher's Notes.

As to applicability of 1983 amendment, see Publisher's Notes to § 24-8-215.

24-8-218. Retirement and survivors' benefits generally.

The retirement benefits to be paid an eligible and qualified member or retiree under the provisions of this section shall be sixty percent (60%) of the annual salary payable to the last judicial office held and shall be payable for the recipient's life.

Survivors' benefits shall be sixty-seven percent (67%) of the amount of the retirement benefits.

Upon the death of an active judge who has served at least three (3) years, or any other judge who has met or could have met the qualifications for retirement benefits under any section of this subchapter, his or her survivors shall receive a sum equal to sixty-seven percent (67%) of the retirement benefits provided in subsection (a) of this section.

The requirement of three (3) years of service shall only apply to judges elected after July 1, 1983.

Survivors' benefits shall be payable as follows:

If the decedent is survived by a spouse to whom he or she has been married for not less than one (1) year and with whom he or she is living at the time of the decedent's death and if he or she is not survived by any minor child or children, then the spouse shall draw for life or until remarriage a sum equal to sixty-seven percent (67%) of the benefits provided in subsection (a) of this section;

If the decedent is survived by both an eligible spouse and minor children, then one-half (½) of the survivors' benefits shall be paid to the spouse for life or until remarriage. The other one-half (½) of the survivors' benefits shall be paid to the guardian of the minor children during the period of minority.

When all of the children cease to be minors, then the survivors' benefits paid to the minor children shall be paid to the spouse; and

If the decedent is not survived by an eligible spouse but is survived by minor children, then the survivors' benefits, i.e., sixty-seven percent (67%) of the benefits provided in subsection (a) of this section, shall be payable to the guardian of the minor children during the period of minority.

If a surviving spouse who is receiving survivors' benefits under this section remarries and the benefits are discontinued and the surviving spouse again becomes unmarried, benefits provided in this section for the spouse shall be resumed.

No surviving spouse shall be eligible to receive survivors' benefits on more than one (1) member account.

The retirement benefits and survivors' benefits provided for in this section shall be based on the salary for the judicial office last held by the member qualifying for retirement as fixed by law at the time any payment of benefits is made rather than on the salary for the office at the time of the member's retirement.

The retirement benefits shall be increased or decreased from time to time as the salary for the particular judicial office is increased or decreased.

This method of determination of the amount of retirement or survivors' benefits shall be applicable to any person who is a member of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System on or before June 30, 1983.

For all judges or justices first elected after July 1, 1983, the benefit payable shall be sixty percent (60%) of the salary after twenty (20) years or more of judicial service, for the office at the time of the member's retirement.

Prospective with the passage of this act, the benefit payable for each year of additional service after twenty (20) years of judicial service, the benefit shall be increased by two and one-half percent (2.5%) in accordance with the provisions of § 24-8-211(b).

Election to participate shall be made in writing in a manner and method determined by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System and shall be irrevocable.

The maximum retirement benefit payable to a judge or justice under this section is seventy-five percent (75%) of the salary for the office at the time of the member's retirement.

Any judge or justice under the age of seventy (70) who is receiving retirement benefits under this subchapter or § 24-8-701 et seq. and who is elected or appointed to any judicial office in this state and who foregoes receipt of retirement benefits while serving in the judicial office shall be entitled to resume receiving his or her previous retirement benefits upon termination of the subsequent service.

If at the time of the initial retirement the judge or justice was entitled to the benefits of the escalator clause provided in subdivision (c)(1) of this section or the postretirement benefits provided in § 24-8-223 or § 24-8-717, the judge or justice and the judge's or justice's survivors shall again be entitled to the benefits upon the termination of any such subsequent judicial service.

Entitlement to retirement compensation and survivors' benefits for those judges who have retired as of June 30, 1983, shall be based upon certificates of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System previously filed with the Auditor of State.

Entitlement to retirement compensation and survivors' benefits for those judges who retire on or after July 1, 1983, shall be evidenced by the certificate of the board transmitted to the executive director.

All retirement compensation and survivors' benefits shall be paid monthly from the Judges Retirement Fund.

All retirement and survivors' benefits provided by this subchapter shall be paid from the fund to be administered by the executive director and staff of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 365, § 4; 1963, No. 223, § 2; 1965, No. 139, § 3; 1971, No. 88, §§ 1, 2; 1973, No. 407, §§ 2, 3; 1975, No. 333, § 1; 1981, No. 825, § 1; 1983, No. 231, § 3; 1983, No. 373, § 1; 1983, No. 922, § 10; 1985, No. 1077, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-904; Acts 1993, No. 407, § 1; 1999, No. 399, § 3; 2001, No. 763, § 2; 2009, No. 744, § 2.

Publisher's Notes.

As to applicability of amendment by Acts 1983, No. 231, see Publisher's Notes to § 24-8-215.

In reference to the term “passage of this Act,” Acts 2009, No. 744, was signed by the Governor on April 1, 2009, and became effective on July 1, 2009.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (c)(3), inserted “after twenty (20) years or more of judicial service” in (c)(3)(B), inserted (c)(3)(C), and made a minor stylistic change.

Effective Dates.

Acts 2001, No. 763, § 6, provided: “The revised benefits which are adopted pursuant to this act shall be extended to current and future members of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System and to current retired members and current survivor annuitants of the system.”

24-8-219. Rights of surviving unremarried spouses of certain judges.

The surviving unremarried spouse, sixty-five (65) years of age or older, of any person who served as a justice of the Supreme Court, as a judge of the Court of Appeals, or as a judge of any circuit or chancery court of the State of Arkansas for a period of eight (8) years or longer, who is not now receiving, or entitled to receive, survivors' benefits under the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System shall be entitled to receive survivors' benefits under the system upon meeting the qualifications therefor and otherwise complying with the provisions of this section.

Any person desiring to apply for and draw benefits provided for in this section shall make application to the Auditor of State.

The application shall be supported and accompanied by proof satisfactory to the Auditor of State that the applicant is an unmarried spouse, sixty-five (65) years of age or older, of a person who served either on the Supreme Court, as a judge of the Court of Appeals, or as a circuit or chancery judge for a period of eight (8) years or longer, and that the applicant was married to the deceased justice or judge for at least five (5) years, was married to him or her at the time of his or her death, and was living with him or her in marriage at the time of his or her death.

Upon receipt of the application and proof, the Auditor of State shall determine the total amount of compensation received by the deceased judge subsequent to July 1, 1953, and shall compute four percent (4%) of that amount as the amount the applicant shall pay to the Auditor of State if the applicant desires to qualify for survivor benefits under the system as permitted in this section.

The Auditor of State shall also determine the amount which would have been paid to the applicant had the deceased spouse been qualified under the system.

The Auditor of State shall credit the amount as determined in subsection (d) of this section against the amount which has been computed as the four-percent amount which the applicant is required to pay under subsection (c) of this section.

The applicant shall be required to pay to the Auditor of State only the amount by which the four-percent figure exceeds the credit.

This payment shall be deposited into the State Survivor's Account by the Auditor of State.

Upon payment of the adjusted amount as required and prescribed in this section, if payment is due after application of credits, the applicant shall be entitled to draw survivors' benefits as prescribed in the system from the first day of the month following payment of the adjusted amount to the Auditor of State, or from the first day after the accounts are adjusted if no payment is due.

Survivors' benefits provided for in this section shall be paid in the same manner as other survivors' benefits under the system are paid.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 484, §§ 1-7; 1979, No. 636, §§ 1, 2; 1981, No. 909, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 22-949 — 22-955; Acts 2017, No. 265, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment inserted “as a judge of the Court of Appeals” in (a) and (b)(2).

24-8-220. Restrictions on benefits.

Acts 1953, No. 365, as amended by this act, is to be in all of its sections complementary, except that no person may take benefits under two (2) or more sections of this act at the same time.

Retirement and survivors' benefits shall be measured by the salary payable for the position last held by the retired or deceased judge at the time of payment of any particular benefit, so that, should salaries of the judicial positions covered by this act be altered, the amount of benefits payable under this act shall be proportionately altered.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 139, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-911.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1953, No. 365 is codified at §§ 24-8-201, 24-8-203, 24-8-207, 24-8-211, 24-8-215, 24-8-217, and 24-8-218.

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-8-202.

24-8-221. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning judicial service after retirement, was repealed by Acts 1999, No. 390, § 8. The section was derived from Acts 1965, No. 139, § 4; 1981, No. 603, § 1; 1983, No. 158, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-910.

24-8-222. Credited service — Transfer of service as juvenile judge.

Any member of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System who has credit in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System for service as a juvenile judge is authorized to transfer that credit to the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System by:

Notifying in writing the administrative body of each of the retirement systems of the intention to transfer his or her tenure;

Authorizing the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System to transfer to the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System all contributions paid by and on behalf of the former juvenile judge, together with six percent (6%) interest compounded from the date of payment; and

Paying into the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System the total contributions which would have been paid, based on the member's current salary, for an equal amount of tenure as a member of this system, less the amount of money transferred from the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

Upon transferring his or her credited service, the member shall be credited in the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System with the same amount of time with which he or she had been previously credited in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System for service as a juvenile judge.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 198, § 1.

24-8-223. Redetermination of benefits.

Each July 1 the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System shall redetermine the amount of each monthly benefit which has been payable by the system for at least twelve (12) full calendar months. The redetermined amount shall be payable for the following twelve (12) calendar months.

The redetermined amount shall be the amount of benefit payable as of the immediately preceding July 1 increased by three percent (3%).

This method of redetermination of the amount of the retirement benefits shall be applicable to any judge first elected after July 1, 1983.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 887, §§ 1-3; 1997, No. 129, § 1; 1999, No. 388, § 1.

24-8-224. Benefits when serving past mandatory retirement age.

Notwithstanding § 24-8-215 regarding mandatory retirement under the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System for any judge or justice upon reaching seventy (70) years of age or any other law to the contrary, any judge or justice covered under the system who served continuously for at least sixteen (16) years, who is at least eighty (80) years of age, who is not serving on April 19, 1995, and who is ineligible for retirement due to having served beyond the mandatory retirement age shall be entitled to receive retirement benefits under the system.

Retirement benefits under this section shall be retroactive to January 1, 1995, or, for judges or justices retiring after 1995, to January 1 of the year of retirement.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1355, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§ 24-8-201 — 24-8-207 and 24-8-209 — 24-8-220 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

24-8-225. Limitation on benefit enhancement — Acts 1997, No. 926.

No benefit enhancement provided for by § 24-8-214 shall be implemented if it would cause the publicly supported retirement system's unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities to exceed a thirty-year amortization.

No benefit enhancement provided for by § 24-8-214 shall be implemented by any publicly supported system which has unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities being amortized over a period exceeding thirty (30) years until the unfunded actuarial accrued liability is reduced to a level less than the standards prescribed by § 24-1-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 926, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§ 24-8-201 — 24-8-207 and 24-8-209 — 24-8-220 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

24-8-226. Minimum benefits.

The following minimum benefits shall apply to any plan based only on actual service under the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System:

The annual minimum disability benefit shall be equal to twenty-five and six-tenths percent (25.6%) of the annual salary of the judge or justice; and

The annual minimum survivors' benefit shall be an amount equal to seventeen and one hundred fifty-two thousandths percent (17.152%) of the annual salary of the judge or justice.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1067, § 1; 2001, No. 763, § 3.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§ 24-8-201 — 24-8-207 and 24-8-209 — 24-8-220 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

Effective Dates.

Acts 2001, No. 763, § 6, provided: “The revised benefits which are adopted pursuant to this act shall be extended to current and future members of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System and to current retired members and current survivor annuitants of the system.”

24-8-227. Definition.

Unless the context requires otherwise, any listing of judges or justices in § 24-8-201 et seq. and § 24-8-701 et seq. shall include all judges and justices in the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1067, § 3.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§ 24-8-201 — 24-8-207 and 24-8-209 — 24-8-220 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

24-8-228. Proposals to establish or revise benefits.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System shall present to the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs information concerning the statutory authority and actuarial appropriateness of proposed board actions to establish or revise a multiplier or any benefit.

An individual who received a refund of contributions from the Arkansas Judicial Retirement System after January 1, 1998, may repay the contributions to the system no later than six (6) months after July 1, 1999.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1325, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§ 24-8-201 — 24-8-207 and 24-8-209 — 24-8-220 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

Subchapter 3
— Municipal Judges and Clerks Generally

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§ 24-8-301, 24-8-302, 24-8-304 — 24-8-312, 24-8-314, and 24-8-319 may not apply to §§ 24-8-313, 24-8-315, 24-8-317, and 24-8-318 which were enacted subsequently.

Ark. Const., Am. 80, § 19(A)(2) provided that all circuit, chancery, and circuit-chancery judges “in office at the time this amendment takes effect shall continue in office as Circuit judges . . .” Amendment 80 further provided in § 19(B)(1) that the circuit courts would “assume the jurisdiction of Circuit, Chancery, Probate and Juvenile Courts.” Amendment 80 also provides that many of the lower courts will combine into district courts. The first portion of Amendment 80, § 19(B)(2) states: “District Courts shall have the jurisdiction vested in Municipal Courts, Corporation Courts, Police Courts, Justice of the Peace Courts, and Courts of Common Pleas at the time this Amendment takes effect. District Courts shall assume the jurisdiction of these courts of limited jurisdiction and other jurisdiction conferred in this Amendment on January 1, 2005.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1973, No. 432, § 10: Mar. 23, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “This act being deemed of importance to the Administration of justice in the Municipal Court system, it is considered necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, and an emergency is hereby declared and it shall be in force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 62, § 3: Feb. 12, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined that this Act is immediately necessary to allow any municipal court clerk, who inadvertently failed to elect to participate in the city retirement system prior to the deadline set forth in Act 432 of 1973, to withdraw from the Public Employees Retirement System and join the city retirement system; and that this Act is immediately necessary to allow such election. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 845, § 4: Became law without Governor's signature, Mar. 28, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the municipal court of Warren, Arkansas is elected by the qualified electors of Bradley County and has countywide jurisdiction, and is more appropriately referred to as the ‘Bradley County Municipal Court’; that the maximum salary currently prescribed by law for the judge for said court is inadequate; that this Act is designed to designate such court the ‘Bradley County Municipal Court’ and to increase the maximum salary authorized for the judge of said court and therefore should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 265, § 3: Mar. 5, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the intent of the Municipal Judges' Retirement law is to provide adequate and suitable benefits for the retirement of judges and for the security of their surviving widows, to the extent provided in said Act, unless they shall remarry subsequent to the death of a municipal judge; that clarification of Act 432 of 1973, as amended, is necessary to enable the widow of a municipal judge who died while serving in such capacity and who had accumulated at least fifteen (15) years of service as a municipal judge in a county in this State authorized by the Constitution to have two districts and two county seats to obtain the benefits under the Judges' Retirement Act as intended for surviving widows of deceased municipal judges; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to establish the rights of such widow to receive a widow's surviving benefit without undue delay upon reaching her forty-seventh (47th) birthday. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect immediately upon its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 641, § 4: Apr. 4, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that due to the demise of revenue sharing many cities in the State are placed in a financial crisis of depleting general revenue to supply necessary services to their citizens; that shifting the payment of retirement benefits from the city general fund to another fund would free some monies to be used for such services. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 873, § 6: Mar. 22, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the salaries currently prescribed by law for judges of the various municipal courts in the State are inadequate to compensate the judges of such courts for their services; that the effective and efficient operation of the municipal courts in the State are essential to the administration of justice and that this act is necessary to assure the effective and efficient operation of such courts and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 499, § 2; Retroactive to Jan. 1, 1990.

Acts 1991, No. 904, § 28: Mar. 29, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the language of certain court cost statutes lacks uniformity; that such lack of uniformity is detrimental to the proper collection of such court costs; and that such language should be standardized to promote the proper collection of such costs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 71, § 6: Mar. 20, 1992. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas meeting in the First Extraordinary Session of 1992 that an error was made in the legislative process of incorporating amendments into the language of Act 851 of 1991 and a scrivener's error was made in the course of writing the bill which eventually became Act 429 of 1991 and that the errors in language will create some confusion as to the meaning of Act 851 of 1991 and the effectiveness of Act 429 of 1991 and thereby affect the administration of justice in the municipal courts of those affected counties and the retirement benefits of those fireman's funds. Therefore, in order to correct the errant language and dispel any confusion as to the meaning of Act 851 of 1991 and to correct the scrivener's errors of Act 429 of 1991, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 239, § 5: Became law without the Governor's signature. Noted Feb. 24, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the retirement eligibility law for municipal judges is inadequate; that this act makes the necessary changes to include eligibility criteria not now in the law; and that this act should be given effect as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 792, § 5: Became law without Governor's signature. Noted Mar. 23, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the retirement eligibility law for municipal judges is inadequate; that this act makes the necessary changes to include eligibility criteria not now in the law; and this act should be given effect as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 1242, § 5: Became law without Governor's signature. Noted April 13, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the service rendered by municipal court clerks to the citizens and the State of Arkansas was not adequately compensated, that certain former municipal court clerks who chose not to remain in the PERS system will be stripped of their retirement benefits unless they are restored to them; and that this will create an inequity for all those former court clerks and equity and justice demands that this inequity be corrected immediately. Therefore, in order to correct this injustice and inequity, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 13, § 13: Oct. 23, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current system of funding the state judicial system has created inequity in the level of judicial services available to the citizens of the state; and it is further determined that the current method of financing the state judicial system has become so complex as to make the administration of the system impossible, and the lack of reliable data on the current costs of the state judicial system prohibits any comprehensive change in the funding of the system at this time. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 571, § 6: Mar. 17, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Act 1256 of 1995 repealed Arkansas Code § 24-8-303 and effectively capped the court costs funding mechanism used to fund the retirement benefits for municipal court judges and court clerks; that the use of court costs alone does not provide an adequate source of funding for the municipal judges' and court clerks' retirement benefits; that retirement benefits costs are continuing to rise faster than the current funding sources; and that it is sound financial planning and necessary to prevent financial disaster to Arkansas cities' to provide a broader financial base through additional sources of funding for these municipal retirement benefits. Therefore, in order to promote a sound financial plan and prevent financial disaster for Arkansas' cities, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1999, No. 1066, § 12: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that benefit provisions applicable to local officers and employees need revision, and that the effective administration of this act makes it necessary for these changes to begin at the start of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2007, No. 177, § 15: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this bill affects the structure of the Arkansas District Judge Retirement System and the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and the ideal time to make revisions to the retirement systems is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Cross References.

Arkansas District Judge Retirement System, § 24-8-801 et seq.

24-8-301. Subchapter cumulative.

This subchapter shall not repeal existing laws of this state relating to the retirement of municipal court judges and municipal court clerks but shall be cumulative thereto, specifically to §§ 24-8-401 and 24-8-403 — 24-8-408, and acts amendatory thereof. It shall in no manner affect the rights or status of persons receiving or eligible to receive retirement benefits under the provisions of §§ 24-8-401 and 24-8-403 — 24-8-408.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 432, § 9; 1981, No. 62, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 22-922.